Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF176.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1955HV (2) 91 as/js H.F. 176 Section 1. Section 724.26, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 1. a. A person who is convicted of a felony in a state or 3 federal court, or who is adjudicated delinquent on the basis 4 of conduct that would constitute a felony if committed by an 5 adult, and who knowingly has under the personâs dominion and 6 control or possession, receives, or transports or causes to be 7 transported a firearm or offensive weapon is guilty of a class 8 âDâ felony the following: 9 (1) A class âDâ felony for a first offense, with commitment 10 to the custody of the director of the department of corrections 11 for an indeterminate term not to exceed five years with a 12 mandatory minimum term of confinement of two years . 13 (2) A class âDâ felony for a second offense, with commitment 14 to the custody of the director of the department of corrections 15 for an indeterminate term not to exceed five years with a 16 mandatory minimum term of confinement of four years. 17 (3) A class âCâ felony for a third offense, with commitment 18 to the custody of the director of the department of corrections 19 for an indeterminate term not to exceed ten years with a 20 mandatory minimum term of confinement of seven years. 21 (4) A class âCâ felony for a fourth or subsequent offense, 22 with commitment to the custody of the director of the 23 department of corrections for an indeterminate term not to 24 exceed ten years with a mandatory minimum term of confinement 25 of ten years. 26 b. The court shall not defer judgment or sentencing, 27 or suspend execution of any mandatory minimum sentence of 28 incarceration imposed by this subsection. 29 c. Earned time accrued by a person convicted under this 30 subsection shall not be applied to reduce any mandatory minimum 31 sentence imposed. Earned time accrued shall be credited 32 against the personâs indeterminate term of incarceration, but 33 shall not reduce any mandatory minimum sentence imposed. 34 EXPLANATION 35 -1- LSB 1955HV (2) 91 as/js 1/ 2 H.F. 176 The inclusion of this explanation does not constitute agreement with 1 the explanationâs substance by the members of the general assembly. 2 This bill relates to mandatory minimum sentences relating 3 to the control, possession, receipt, or transportation of a 4 firearm or offensive weapon by a felon. 5 Current law provides that a person who is convicted of a 6 felony in a state or federal court, or who is adjudicated 7 delinquent on the basis of conduct that would constitute a 8 felony if committed by an adult, and who knowingly has under 9 the personâs dominion and control or possession, receives, or 10 transports or causes to be transported a firearm or offensive 11 weapon is guilty of a class âDâ felony. 12 The bill establishes penalties for first, second, third, and 13 fourth and subsequent violations, and requires commitment to 14 the custody of the director of the department of corrections 15 for a mandatory minimum term of incarceration. The bill 16 provides the following: a first offense is a class âDâ felony 17 with a mandatory minimum term of confinement of two years; a 18 second offense is a class âDâ felony with a mandatory minimum 19 term of confinement of four years; a third offense is a class 20 âCâ felony with a mandatory minimum term of confinement of 21 seven years; and a fourth or subsequent offense is a class 22 âCâ felony with a mandatory minimum term of confinement of 23 10 years. The maximum period of confinement for a class âDâ 24 felony is five years, and the maximum period of confinement for 25 a class âCâ felony is ten years. 26 The bill provides that the court shall not defer judgment 27 or sentencing, or suspend execution of any mandatory minimum 28 sentence of incarceration. 29 The bill provides that earned time accrued by a person 30 convicted under the bill is not applied to reduce any mandatory 31 minimum sentence imposed. 32 -2- LSB 1955HV (2) 91 as/js 2/ 2